Illinois, session 104th, SB1803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Liability Insurance for Child Care Providers Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that there is an ongoing 8concern regarding the availability and affordability of 9liability insurance for licensed child care providers within 10the State of Illinois.11    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish a framework for 12examining the Child Care Licensing Act and to assess the 13availability and affordability of liability insurance for 14licensed child care providers, with particular focus on 15identifying and addressing the regulatory barriers affecting 16child care operations, safety standards, and insurance 17coverage. 18    Section 10. Interim study on child care licensing and 19liability insurance. 20    (a) The Department of Children and Family Services, in 21consultation with stakeholders, including licensed child care 22providers, business owners, insurance providers, and others,   SB1803- 2 -LRB104 11865 JDS 21955 b1shall conduct a study to investigate:2        (1) the existing rules adopted by the Department of 3    Children and Family Services under the Child Care 4    Licensing Act;5        (2) the availability and affordability of liability 6    insurance for licensed child care providers;7        (3) the impact of regulatory actions and citations 8    issued by licensing representatives on child care 9    providers' ability to obtain or maintain adequate 10    liability insurance coverage; and11        (4) best practices in other states for balancing 12    regulation and insurance requirements to promote safe and 13    sustainable child care programs.14    (b) The study shall include recommendations for improving 15coordination between insurance and licensing agencies, and how 16such cooperation can enhance clarity, consistency, and safety 17in the child care sector. 18    Section 15. Reform of child care licensing regulatory 19system. 20    (a) Following completion of the interim study required 21under Section 10, the Department of Children and Family 22Services shall conduct a systematic review of its 23administrative rules and procedures as necessary to reform the 24child care licensing regulatory system to prioritize 25collaboration and educational support over punitive measures.   SB1803- 3 -LRB104 11865 JDS 21955 b1This reform shall focus on:2        (1) shifting the approach of Department of Children 3    and Family Services licensing representatives from a 4    punitive system to a cooperative one that is characterized 5    by collaboration and the enhancement of safety and 6    operational practices rather than solely punitive 7    measures;8        (2) training licensing representatives of the 9    Department of Children and Family Services to recognize 10    the impact of citations on child care programs, 11    particularly on the ability to maintain insurance 12    coverage; and13        (3) implementing a licensing monitoring point system 14    that is weighted based on the severity of violations and 15    the potential harm or risk to children or program staff.16    (b) To ensure that child care providers are not unfairly 17penalized, the reforms implemented by the Department of 18Children and Family Services under this Section shall ensure 19that:20        (1) no licensing violation are posted within 100 days 21    of a program monitoring visit, unless the violation is 22    uncorrected after that time period; and23        (2) child care providers are permitted up to 90 days 24    from the date of a program monitoring visit to submit 25    evidence showing that a violation cited during the visit 26    was not, in fact, a violation at the time of the visit.   SB1803- 4 -LRB104 11865 JDS 21955 b1    Section 20. Support for insurance affordability. To 2further address the rising costs of liability insurance for 3child care providers, the Department of Children and Family 4Services shall assess and report to the General Assembly 5within one year after the effective date of this Act on the 6feasibility of the following measures:7        (1) the development of insurance subsidies or 8    discounts to reduce the cost of liability insurance for 9    licensed child care providers; and10        (2) the creation of reinsurance pools, allowing 11    private providers to join the State Insurance Pool, caps 12    on premiums, policy adjustments, or other mechanisms 13    designed to control and stabilize insurance costs for 14    child care programs. 15    Section 25. Implementation and oversight. 16    (a) The Department of Children and Family Services is 17responsible for implementation and oversight of the provisions 18of this Act.19    (b) The Department of Children and Family Services shall 20review progress on the implementation of this Act annually and 21provide regular reports on the outcomes of the study, reforms, 22and any actions taken to address the issues identified. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.